Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 2 Grants of Pardons, Paroles, and Other Relief
42-9-44.
Terms and conditions of parole; adoption of general and special rules; violation of parole; certain parolees or releasees to obtain high school diploma or state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma.

The board, upon placing a person on parole or conditional release, shall specify in writing the terms and conditions thereof, and if such person is serving a split sentence, the board’s conditions shall include all of the terms of probation imposed by the sentencing court. A certified copy of the conditions shall be given to the parolee or conditional releasee. Thereafter, a copy shall be sent to the clerk of the court in which the person was convicted. The board shall adopt general rules concerning the terms and conditions of parole or conditional release and concerning what shall constitute a violation thereof and shall make special rules to govern particular cases. The rules, both general and special, may include, among other things, a requirement that the parolee or conditional releasee shall not leave this state or any definite area in this state without the consent of the board; that the parolee or conditional releasee shall contribute to the support of his or her dependents to the best of the parolee’s or conditional releasee’s ability; that the parolee or conditional releasee shall make reparation or restitution for his or her crime; that the parolee or conditional releasee shall abandon evil associates and ways; and that the parolee or conditional releasee shall carry out the instructions of his or her community supervision officer, and, in general, so comport himself or herself as the community supervision officer shall determine. A violation of the terms of parole or conditional release may render the parolee or conditional releasee liable to arrest and a return to a penal institution to serve out the term for which the parolee or conditional releasee was sentenced.

Each parolee or conditional releasee who does not have a high school diploma or a state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma shall be required as a condition of parole or conditional release to obtain a high school diploma or state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma or to pursue a trade at a vocational or technical school. Any such parolee or conditional releasee who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board an existing ability or skill which does in fact actually furnish the parolee or conditional releasee a reliable, regular, and sufficient income shall not be subject to this subsection. Any parolee or conditional releasee who is determined by the department or the board to be incapable of completing such requirements shall only be required to attempt to improve his or her basic educational skills. Failure of any parolee or conditional releasee subject to this requirement to attend the necessary schools or courses or to make reasonable progress toward fulfillment of such requirement shall be grounds for revocation of parole or conditional release. The board shall establish regulations regarding reasonable progress as required by this subsection.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 15; Ga. L. 1995, p. 625, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-87/HB 310; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-12/SB 174; Ga. L. 2022, p. 168, § 9/SB 397.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), substituted “community supervision officer” for “parole supervisor” and “officer” for “supervisor” near the end; in subsection (b), substituted “(GED) diploma” for “equivalency diploma (GED)” twice, and, in the second sentence, substituted “department” for “Department of Corrections” and substituted “his or her basic educational skills” for “their basic educational skills”. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, inserted “or conditional release”, “or conditional releasee”, and “or conditional releasee’s” throughout this Code section; in subsection (a), added “, and if such person is serving a split sentence, the board’s conditions shall include all of the terms of probation imposed by the sentencing court” near the end of the first sentence and substituted “community supervision officer” for “parolee’s officer” in the next to last sentence; and, in subsection (b), substituted “subsection” for “provision” at the end of the second sentence and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “This subsection shall apply to paroles granted on or after July 1, 1995.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “state approved high school equivalency (HSE)” for “general educational development (GED)” twice in the first sentence in subsection (b).

Cross references.

Requirement of restitution by criminal offender as condition of relief generally, §

17-14-3

.

Granting by State Board of Pardons and Paroles of parole conditioned on restitution prior to completion of one-third of sentence, §

17-14-4

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For note on the 1995 amendment of this Code section, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 301 (1995).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

42-9-44.1 and 42-9-44.2.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 791, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1578, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 42/HB 95; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 28/HB 1059, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 28/HB 1059 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2006.

42-9-44.3.
Definitions; required community service; liability; work during periods of natural disaster.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Agency employee” means an employee or agent of a community service agency, whether the individual is a paid or unpaid employee or agent.

“Community service” means uncompensated work by an offender with a community service agency for the benefit of the community pursuant to a directive of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles or its designee as a condition of parole or as an alternative to the revocation of parole.

“Community service agency” means any private or public agency or organization approved by the State Board of Pardons and Paroles to participate in a community service program.

“Community service supervisor” means an individual who places or supervises offenders directed to perform community service, whether the individual is a paid or unpaid supervisor.

“Offender” means a person who has been convicted of a crime, who is under the jurisdiction of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, and who has been granted conditional executive clemency.

The State Board of Pardons and Paroles or its designee may direct an offender to perform community service as a condition of parole or as an alternative to the revocation of parole.

Neither the community service agency nor the community service supervisor or agency employees shall be liable to any offender performing community service for any acts or omissions related to participation in a community service program. This limitation of liability does not apply to any act or omission by any community service agency, community service supervisor, or agency employee that constitutes gross negligence or willful misconduct.

It shall be unlawful to use or to allow an offender to be used for any purpose resulting in private gain to an individual, but this subsection shall not apply to work on private property made necessary due to a natural disaster if the work is approved by the State Board of Pardons and Paroles.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-9-44.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1554, § 1.

42-9-45.
General rule-making power.

The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, not inconsistent with this chapter, touching all matters dealt with in this chapter, including, among others, the practice and procedure in matters pertaining to paroles, pardons, and remission of fines and bond forfeitures. The rules and regulations shall contain an eligibility requirement for parole which shall set forth the time when the automatic initial consideration for parole of inmates under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections shall take place and also the times at which periodic reconsideration thereafter shall take place. Such consideration shall be automatic, and no written or formal application shall be required.

An inmate serving a misdemeanor sentence or misdemeanor sentences shall only be eligible for consideration for parole after the expiration of six months of his or her sentence or sentences or one-third of the time of his or her sentence or sentences, whichever is greater.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Sections 17-10-6.1 and 17-10-7 and paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, an inmate serving a felony sentence or felony sentences shall only be eligible for consideration for parole after the expiration of nine months of his or her sentence or one-third of the time of the sentences, whichever is greater. Except as otherwise provided in Code Sections 17-10-6.1 and 17-10-7 and paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, inmates serving sentences aggregating 21 years or more shall become eligible for consideration for parole upon completion of the service of seven years.

When an inmate was sentenced pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 16-13-30 and subsection (c) of Code Section 17-10-7 to a term of at least 12 years and up to a life sentence, he or she may become eligible for consideration for parole if he or she:

Has never been convicted of:

A serious violent felony as such term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1;

An offense for which he or she was or could have been required to register pursuant to Code Section 42-1-12; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply to any felony that became punishable as a misdemeanor on or after July 1, 2006;

A violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 16-5-21;

A violation of Code Section 16-11-106; and

A violation of Code Section 16-11-131;

Has completed at least 12 years of his or her sentence;

Has obtained a low-risk for recidivism rating as determined by a validated risk assessment instrument approved by the Department of Corrections;

Has been classified as a medium or less than medium security risk for institutional housing classification purposes by the Department of Corrections;

Has completed all criminogenic programming requirements as determined by a validated risk assessment instrument approved by the Department of Corrections;

In the 12 months preceding consideration, has not been found guilty of any serious disciplinary infractions; and

Has a high school diploma or state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma, unless he or she is unable to obtain such educational achievement due to a learning disability or illiteracy. If the inmate is incapable of obtaining such education, he or she shall have completed a job skills training program, a literacy program, an adult basic education program, or a faith based program.

When an inmate was sentenced pursuant to subsection (c), (e), or (l) of Code Section 16-13-30 and subsection (c) of Code Section 17-10-7 to a term of at least six years, he or she may become eligible for consideration for parole if he or she:

Has never been convicted of:

A serious violent felony as such term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1;

An offense for which he or she was or could have been required to register pursuant to Code Section 42-1-12; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply to any felony that became punishable as a misdemeanor on or after July 1, 2006;

A violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 16-5-21;

A violation of Code Section 16-11-106; and

A violation of Code Section 16-11-131;

Has completed at least six years of his or her sentence;

Has obtained a low-risk for recidivism rating as determined by a validated risk assessment instrument approved by the Department of Corrections;

Has been classified as a medium or less than medium security risk for institutional housing classification purposes by the Department of Corrections;

Has completed all criminogenic programming requirements as determined by a validated risk assessment instrument approved by the Department of Corrections;

In the 12 months preceding consideration, has not been found guilty of any serious disciplinary infractions; and

Has a high school diploma or state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma, unless he or she is unable to obtain such educational achievement due to a learning disability or illiteracy. If the inmate is incapable of obtaining such education, he or she shall have completed a job skills training program, a literacy program, an adult basic education program, or a faith based program.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations governing the granting of other forms of clemency, which shall include pardons, reprieves, commutation of penalties, removal of disabilities imposed by law, and the remission of any part of a sentence, and shall prescribe the procedure to be followed in applying for them. Applications for the granting of such other forms of clemency and for exceptions to parole eligibility rules established by statute or promulgated by the board shall be made in such manner as the board shall direct by rules and regulations.

All rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this Code section shall be adopted, established, promulgated, amended, repealed, filed, and published in accordance with the applicable provisions and procedure as set forth in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The courts shall take judicial notice of the rules and regulations.

For the purposes of this Code section, the words “rules and regulations” shall have the same meaning as the word “rule,” as defined in Code Section 50-13-2, except that the words “rules and regulations” shall not be construed to include the terms and conditions prescribed by the board to which a person paroled by the board may be subjected.

Except to correct a patent miscarriage of justice and not otherwise, no inmate serving a sentence imposed for any of the crimes listed in this subsection shall be granted release on parole until and unless said inmate has served on good behavior seven years of imprisonment or one-third of the prison term imposed by the sentencing court for the violent crime, whichsoever first occurs. No inmate serving a sentence for any crime listed in this subsection shall be released on parole for the purpose of regulating jail or prison populations. This subsection shall govern parole actions in sentences imposed for any of the following crimes: voluntary manslaughter, statutory rape, incest, cruelty to children, arson in the first degree, homicide by vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or as a habitual traffic violator, aggravated battery, aggravated assault, trafficking in drugs, and violations of Chapter 14 of Title 16, the “Georgia RICO (Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations) Act.”

No inmate serving a sentence for murder, murder in the second degree, armed robbery, kidnapping, rape, aggravated child molestation, aggravated sodomy, or aggravated sexual battery shall be released on parole for the purpose of regulating jail or prison populations.

An inmate whose criminal offense or history indicates alcohol or drug involvement shall not be considered for parole until such inmate has successfully completed an Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program offered by the Department of Corrections.

An inmate who has committed an offense which has been identified to involve family violence as such term is defined in Code Section 19-13-1 shall not be released on parole until such inmate has successfully completed a Family Violence Counseling Program offered by the Department of Corrections.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 23; Ga. L. 1964, p. 487, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 948, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 42; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3221, § 10; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959, § 15; Ga. L. 1995, p. 625, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1113, § 3; Ga. L. 2014, p. 444, § 2-12/HB 271; Ga. L. 2015, p. 519, § 2-2/HB 328; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-32/HB 233; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 9-1/SB 367; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 42/SB 365; Ga. L. 2022, p. 168, § 9/SB 397.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “murder in the second degree,” near the beginning of subsection (g).

The 2015 amendments.

The first 2015 amendment, effective July 5, 2015, in subsection (b), inserted paragraph (b)(1) and (b)(2) designations, in paragraph (b)(2), inserted “and paragraph (3) of this subsection” twice, and added paragraph (b)(3). See Editor’s notes for applicability. The second 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “fines and bond forfeitures” for “fines and forfeitures” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (a).

The 2016 amendment,

effective April 27, 2016, twice substituted “paragraphs (3) and (4)” for “paragraph (3)” in paragraph (b)(2); and added paragraph (b)(4). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “subsection (a)” for “subsection (b)” in divisions (b)(3)(A)(iii) and (b)(4)(A)(iii).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “state approved high school equivalency (HSE)” for “general educational development (GED)” in the first sentence in subparagraphs (b)(3)(G) and (b)(4)(G).

Cross references.

Power of board to order adult offender to make restitution to victim as condition of any relief ordered, §

17-14-3

.

Power of board to grant parole prior to completion of one-third of sentence if restitution to victim is ordered as condition of parole, §

17-14-4

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, the subsection originally designated as subsection (g) in the 1995 amendment was redesignated as subsection (h), owing to the fact that this Code section already contained a subsection (g).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959, § 18, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 1995, upon ratification by the voters of this state at the 1994 November general election of that proposed amendment to Article IV, Section II, Paragraph II of the Constitution authorizing the General Assembly to provide for mandatory minimum sentences and sentences of life without possibility of parole in certain cases and providing restrictions on the authority of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles to grant paroles. . . .” That amendment was ratified by the voters on November 8, 1994, so this Code section, as set out above, became effective on January 1, 1995.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Sentence Reform Act of 1994.’ ”

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly declares and finds:

“(1) That persons who are convicted of certain serious violent felonies shall serve minimum terms of imprisonment which shall not be suspended, probated, stayed, deferred, or otherwise withheld by the sentencing judge; and

“(2) That sentences ordered by courts in cases of certain serious violent felonies shall be served in their entirety and shall not be reduced by parole or by any earned time, early release, work release, or other such sentence-reducing measures administered by the Department of Corrections.”

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The provisions of this Act shall apply only to those offenses committed on or after the effective date of this Act; provided, however, that any conviction occurring prior to, on, or after the effective date of this Act shall be deemed a ‘conviction’ for the purposes of this Act and shall be counted in determining the appropriate sentence to be imposed for any offense committed on or after the effective date of this Act.”

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959, § 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 180, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“The General Assembly declares and finds: (1) That the ‘Sentence Reform Act of 1994,’ approved April 20, 1994 (Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959), provided that persons convicted of one of seven serious violent felonies shall serve minimum mandatory terms of imprisonment which shall not otherwise be suspended, stayed, probated, deferred, or withheld by the sentencing court; (2) That in

State v. Allmond

,

225 Ga. App. 509

(1997), the Georgia Court of Appeals held, notwithstanding the ‘Sentence Reform Act of 1994,’ that the provisions of the First Offender Act would still be available to the sentencing court, which would mean that a person who committed a serious violent felony could be sentenced to less than the minimum mandatory ten-year sentence; and (3) That, contrary to the decision in

State v. Allmond

, it is the expressed intent of the General Assembly that persons who commit a serious violent felony specified in the ‘Sentence Reform Act of 1994’ shall be sentenced to a mandatory term of imprisonment of not less than ten years and shall not be eligible for first offender treatment.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 519, § 2-2(b)/HB 328, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Act shall be given retroactive effect to those sentences imposed before May 5, 2015, of Part II of this Act.”

Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 14-1/SB 367, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the provisions of Part IX of this Act shall be given retroactive effect to those sentences imposed before the effective date of Part IX of this Act (April 27, 2016).

Law reviews.

For note on the 1994 amendment of this Code section, see 11 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 159 (1994).

For article, “Garner v. Jones: Restricting Prisoners’ Ex Post Facto Challenges to Changes in Parole Systems,” see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 761 (2001).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-9-46.
Cases in which inmate has failed to serve time required for automatic initial consideration; objections.

When the board considers a case in which an inmate has not served the time required by Code Section 42-9-45 for automatic initial parole consideration, the board shall notify in writing, at least ten days prior to such early consideration, the sentencing judge, the district attorney of the circuit in which the inmate was sentenced, and any victim of a violation of Chapter 5 of Title 16 or, if such victim is deceased, the spouse, children, or parents of the deceased victim if such person’s contact information has been provided to the board with a current mailing or email address and telephone number. Such notice shall provide a time frame in which such individuals may file an objection to early parole consideration. The sentencing judge, district attorney, or victim or, if such victim is deceased, the spouse, children, or parents of the deceased victim shall be given notice of a hearing date if a hearing will be held and, in order to express their views and make their recommendation as to whether the inmate should be granted early parole, may appear at such hearing or may make a written statement to the board. If an objection was filed and the board grants early parole, it shall issue a statement explaining its reasoning for granting such parole and such statement shall be served on any party who filed an objection.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 410, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 793, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1001, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 207, § 5/HB 71; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-13/SB 174; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 42/HB 497.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “person’s contact information is provided pursuant to Code Section 17-17-13” for “person’s name and address are provided on the impact statement pursuant to Code Section 17-10-1.1” near the end of the first sentence.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, if the board is to consider any case in which an inmate has failed to serve the time required by law for automatic initial consideration, the board shall notify in writing, at least ten days prior to consideration, the sentencing judge, the district attorney of the county in which the person was sentenced, and any victim of crimes against the person or, if such victim is deceased, the spouse, children, or parents of the deceased victim if such person’s contact information is provided pursuant to Code Section 17-17-13. The sentencing judge, district attorney, or victim or, if such victim is deceased, the spouse, children, or parents of the deceased victim may appear at a hearing held by the board or make a written statement to the board expressing their views and making their recommendation as to whether the person should be paroled.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “email” for “e-mail” near the end of the first sentence.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

42-9-47.
Notification of decision to parole inmate.

Within 72 hours after the board reaches a final decision to parole an inmate, the district attorney, the presiding judge, the sheriff of each county in which the inmate was tried, convicted, and sentenced, the local law enforcement authorities of the county of the last residence of the inmate prior to incarceration, and the victim of crimes against the person shall be notified of the decision by the chairman of the board. Such notice to the victim shall be mailed or emailed to the victim’s address if such information is provided pursuant to Code Section 17-17-13. Failure of the victim to inform the board of a change of address shall not void a parole date set by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 393, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 739, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 207, § 6/HB 71; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 42/HB 497.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “mailed or e-mailed to the victim’s address if such information is provided pursuant to Code Section 17-17-13.” for “mailed to the victim’s address provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 17-10-1.1.” at the end of the second sentence; and substituted “Failure of the victim” for “Failure of the prosecuting attorney to provide an address of the victim or failure of the victim” in the last sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “emailed” for “e-mailed” in the second sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 739, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would only apply to cases filed on or after July 1, 1985.

42-9-48.
Arrest of parolee or conditional release violator.

If any member of the board shall have reasonable ground to believe that any parolee or conditional releasee has lapsed into criminal ways or has violated the terms and conditions of his parole or conditional release in a material respect, the member may issue a warrant for the arrest of the parolee or conditional releasee.

The warrant, if issued by a member or the board, shall be returned before the board and shall command that the alleged violator of parole or conditional release be brought before the board for a final hearing on revocation of parole or conditional release within a reasonable time after the preliminary hearing provided for in Code Section 42-9-50.

All officers authorized to serve criminal process, all peace officers of this state, and all employees of the department whom the commissioner of community supervision specifically designates in writing shall be authorized to execute the warrant.

Any community supervision officer, when he or she has reasonable ground to believe that a parolee or conditional releasee has violated the terms or conditions of his or her parole or conditional release in a material respect, shall notify the board or some member thereof; and proceedings shall thereupon be had as provided in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 16; Ga. L. 1965, p. 478, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 187, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 786, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1020, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-88/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (c), substituted “department whom the commissioner of community supervision” for “board”; and, in subsection (d), substituted “community supervision officer, when he or she” for “parole supervisor, when he” near the beginning and inserted “or her” near the middle. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-9-49.
Reimbursement of counties for incarceration of persons arrested in accordance with Code Section 42-9-48.

After proper documentation is received from the county, the board shall reimburse the county, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the board and in the amount appropriated for this purpose by the General Assembly, for the cost of incarceration of any person who is arrested pursuant to any warrant issued in accordance with Code Section 42-9-48. To the extent that funds are appropriated by the General Assembly for the purpose of reimbursement of medical expenses, the board may reimburse counties for the cost of medical services provided to persons so arrested. The liability of the board for such costs of incarceration shall begin when the person is incarcerated and shall end upon revocation of parole or conditional release of the person. This Code section shall apply only to cases in which the board’s warrant is the sole basis for incarceration.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 798, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 428, § 1.

42-9-50.
Preliminary hearing for parole or conditional release violator; ratification or overruling of decision of hearing officer by board; disposition of violator.

Whenever a parolee or conditional releasee is arrested on a warrant issued by a member of the board for an alleged violation of parole or conditional release, an informal preliminary hearing in the nature of a court of inquiry shall be held at or near the place of the alleged violation. However, a preliminary hearing is not required if the parolee or conditional releasee is not under arrest on a warrant issued by the board, has absconded from supervision, has signed a waiver of a preliminary hearing, has admitted any alleged violation to any representative of the board in the presence of a third party who is not a representative of the board, or has been convicted of any crime in a federal court or in a court of this state or of another state.

The proceeding shall commence within a reasonable time after the arrest of the parolee or conditional releasee. Its purpose shall be to determine whether there is probable cause or reasonable grounds to believe that the arrested parolee or conditional releasee has committed acts which would constitute a violation of his parole or conditional release.

The preliminary hearing shall be conducted by a hearing officer designated by the board, who shall be some officer who is not directly involved in the case. It shall be the duty of the officer conducting the hearing to make a summary or digest, which may be in the form of a tape recording, of what transpires at the hearing in terms of the testimony and other evidence given in support of or against revocation. In addition, the officer shall state the reasons for his decision that probable cause for revocation does or does not exist and shall indicate the evidence relied upon.

It shall be the responsibility of the officer selected to conduct the preliminary hearing to provide the alleged violator with written notice of the time and place of the proceeding, its purpose, and the violations which have been alleged. This notice shall allow a reasonable time for the alleged violator to prepare his case.

The officer selected to conduct the preliminary hearing shall have the power to issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses resident within the county of the alleged violation after notice of 24 hours. The subpoenas shall be issued without discrimination between public and private parties. When a subpoena is disobeyed, any party may apply to the superior court of the county in which the hearing provided for by this Code section is held for an order requiring obedience. Failure to comply with the order shall be cause for punishment as for contempt of court. The manner of service of subpoenas and costs of securing the attendance of witnesses, including fees and mileage, shall be determined, computed, and assessed in the same manner as is prescribed by law for cases in the superior court.

The officer selected to conduct the preliminary hearing shall also have power to issue subpoenas for the production of documents or other written evidence at the hearing provided for by this Code section; but upon written request made promptly and before the hearing, the officer may quash or modify the subpoena if it is unreasonable or oppressive or may condition denial of the request upon the advancement by the person in whose behalf the subpoena is issued of the reasonable cost of producing the documents or other written evidence. Enforcement of the subpoenas may be sought in the same manner as is provided in subsection (e) of this Code section for subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses.

At the hearing, the alleged violator may appear and speak in his own behalf, may present witnesses to testify in his behalf, and may bring letters, documents, or any other relevant information to the hearing officer. He shall also have the right to cross-examine those who have given adverse information at the preliminary hearing relating to the alleged violation, provided that the hearing officer may refuse to allow such questioning if he determines that the informant would be subjected to risk of harm if his identity were disclosed.

Should the hearing officer determine that probable cause for revocation exists, he shall then determine whether the alleged violator should be incarcerated pending his final revocation hearing or whether he should be set free on his personal recognizance pending that hearing. If an alleged violator who is set free on his personal recognizance subsequently fails to appear at his final hearing, the board may summarily revoke his parole or conditional release.

The decision of the hearing officer as to probable cause for revocation shall not be binding on the board but may be either ratified or overruled by majority vote of the board. In the event that the board overrules a determination of the hearing officer that probable cause did not exist, the board shall then determine whether the alleged violator should be incarcerated pending his final hearing or whether he should be set free on his personal recognizance pending that hearing. If an alleged violator who is set free on personal recognizance subsequently fails to appear at his final hearing, the board may summarily revoke his parole or conditional release. Where a hearing officer has determined, after finding probable cause, that the alleged violator should be set free on his personal recognizance, the board may overrule that decision and order the alleged violator to be incarcerated pending his final hearing.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 786, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 812, § 1.